Massachusetts, session 194th, H1675.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 39 of Chapter 265 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended in line 4 by inserting after the words “national origin, ” the following: “sex,
gender,”
of 1